Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1311
Rules and regulations; investigations.

The agency shall adopt, amend, or repeal such rules and regulations as are necessary for the enforcement of the provisions of sections 76-1301 to 76-1315, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, regarding the adoption of such rules and regulations. The agency shall thoroughly investigate all matters relating to the application and may require a personal inspection of the real estate by a person or persons designated by it. All expenses incurred by the agency in investigating such real estate and the proposed sale thereof shall be borne by the developer and the agency shall require a deposit sufficient to cover such expenses prior to incurring the same.

Laws 1972, LB 1311, § 11.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.